Texas, session 892, HB306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 214.212, Local Government Code, is amended by amending Subsections (a), (b), and (d) and adding Subsection (b-1) to read as follows: (a)  To protect the public health, safety, and welfare, the International Residential Code, as it existed on May 1, 2018 [2012], is adopted as a municipal residential building code in this state. (b)  Except as provided by Subsection (b-1), the [The] International Residential Code applies to all construction, alteration, remodeling, enlargement, and repair of residential structures in a municipality. (b-1)  To the extent the International Residential Code applies to a building or structure on or used in connection with an agricultural operation, the International Residential Code, as it existed on May 1, 2012, applies to all construction, alteration, remodeling, enlargement, and repair of those buildings or structures. (d)  A municipality may review and consider amendments made by the International Code Council to the International Residential Code after May 1, 2018 [2012]. SECTION 2.  Section 214.216, Local Government Code, is amended by amending Subsections (a), (b), and (d) and adding Subsection (b-1) to read as follows: (a)  To protect the public health, safety, and welfare, the International Building Code, as it existed on May 1, 2018 [2012], is adopted as a municipal commercial building code in this state. (b)  Except as provided by Subsection (b-1), the [The] International Building Code applies to all commercial buildings in a municipality and to any alteration, remodeling, enlargement, or repair of those commercial buildings. (b-1)  To the extent the International Building Code applies to a building or structure on or used in connection with an agricultural operation, the International Building Code, as it existed on May 1, 2012, applies to all construction, alteration, remodeling, enlargement, and repair of those buildings or structures. (d)  A municipality may review and consider amendments made by the International Code Council to the International Building Code after May 1, 2018 [2012]. SECTION 3.  (a)  Sections 214.212 and 214.216, Local Government Code, as amended by this Act, apply only to residential or commercial construction, remodeling, alteration, enlargement, or repair that begins under an agreement made on or after January 1, 2027, or that begins, in the absence of an agreement, on or after that date.  Residential or commercial construction, remodeling, alteration, enlargement, or repair that begins under an agreement made before January 1, 2027, or that begins, in the absence of an agreement, before that date is governed by the law in effect when the agreement was made or the activity began, as appropriate, and that law is continued in effect for that purpose. (b)  Not later than January 1, 2027, municipalities shall establish rules and take other necessary actions to implement Sections 214.212 and 214.216, Local Government Code, as amended by this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.